Illinois, session 104th, HB4029.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 534-6 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/34-6)  (from Ch. 122, par. 34-6)7    Sec. 34-6. Superintendent of schools. The After June 30, 81999, the board shall may, by a vote of a majority of its full 9membership, appoint a general superintendent of schools to 10serve pursuant to a performance-based contract for a term 11ending on June 30th of the third calendar year after the his or 12her appointment. The general superintendent He shall be the 13chief administrative officer of the board and shall have 14charge and control, subject to the approval of the board and to 15other provisions of this Article, of all departments and the 16employees therein of public schools, except the law 17department. The general superintendent He shall negotiate 18contracts with all labor organizations which are exclusive 19representatives of educational employees employed under the 20Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act. All contracts shall 21be subject to approval of the Board of Education. The general 22superintendent shall have all of the powers and duties of a 23chief executive officer as set forth in this Article. The   HB4029- 2 -LRB104 12909 LNS 24434 b1board may conduct a national search for a general 2superintendent. An incumbent general superintendent may not be 3precluded from being included in such national search. Persons 4appointed pursuant to this Section shall be exempt from the 5provisions and requirements of Sections 21-1a, 21-7.1, and 621B-15 of this Code.7(Source: P.A. 97-607, eff. 8-26-11.) 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.